Massachusetts, session 194th, S713.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 24B of Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition is hereby amended by inserting after the word “modifications”, in line 14, the following
words:- , not less than 6 months in advance of such modifications,
of 1